Tennessee, session 114, SB1770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 36, Chapter 4, is amended by adding
the following new section:
A divorce proceeding must not be stayed or delayed due to the pregnancy of one
(1) of the parties if the court can determine or both parties can agree to stipulate as to:
(1) Whether the other party is the parent of the unborn child; and
(2) If applicable, the entry of an agreed parenting plan and child support
order.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1770
011232
- 1 -